Texas statutes.
FAMILY CODE

TITLE 5. THE PARENT-CHILD RELATIONSHIP AND THE SUIT AFFECTING THE PARENT-CHILD RELATIONSHIP

SUBTITLE D. ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES

CHAPTER 232. SUSPENSION OF LICENSE

Sec. 232.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "License" means a license, certificate, registration, permit, or other authorization that:

(A) is issued by a licensing authority;

(B) is subject before expiration to renewal, suspension, revocation, forfeiture, or termination by a licensing authority; and

(C) a person must obtain to:

(i) practice or engage in a particular business, occupation, or profession;

(ii) operate a motor vehicle on a public highway in this state; or

(iii) engage in any other regulated activity, including hunting, fishing, or other recreational activity for which a license or permit is required.

(2) "Licensing authority" means a department, commission, board, office, or other agency of the state or a political subdivision of the state that issues or renews a license or that otherwise has authority to suspend or refuse to renew a license.

(3) "Order suspending license" means an order issued by the Title IV-D agency or a court directing a licensing authority to suspend or refuse to renew a license.

(3-a) "Renewal" means any instance when a licensing authority:

(A) renews, extends, recertifies, or reissues a license; or

(B) periodically certifies a licensee to be in good standing with the licensing authority based on the required payment of fees or dues or the performance of some other mandated action or activity.

(4) "Subpoena" means a judicial or administrative subpoena issued in a parentage determination or child support proceeding under this title.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 655, Sec. 5.03, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 751, Sec. 85, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 911, Sec. 82, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1023, Sec. 58, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 972 (S.B. 228), Sec. 50, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 859 (S.B. 1726), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 232.002. LICENSING AUTHORITIES SUBJECT TO CHAPTER. Unless otherwise restricted or exempted, all licensing authorities are subject to this chapter.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 655, Sec. 5.03, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 751, Sec. 85, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 7.22, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1280, Sec. 1.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1288, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1254, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1477, Sec. 23, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 394, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 553, Sec. 2.003, eff. Feb. 1, 2004.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 798 (S.B. 411), Sec. 4.01, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 972 (S.B. 228), Sec. 51, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 232.0021. APPLICATION OF CHAPTER TO TEXAS LOTTERY COMMISSION. With respect to the Texas Lottery Commission, this chapter applies only to a lottery ticket sales agent license issued under Chapter 466, Government Code.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 394, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 232.0022. SUSPENSION OR NONRENEWAL OF MOTOR VEHICLE REGISTRATION. (a) The Texas Department of Motor Vehicles is the appropriate licensing authority for suspension or nonrenewal of a motor vehicle registration under this chapter.

(b) The suspension or nonrenewal of a motor vehicle registration under this chapter does not:

(1) encumber the title to the motor vehicle or otherwise affect the transfer of the title to the vehicle; or

(2) affect the sale, purchase, or registration of the motor vehicle by a person who holds a general distinguishing number issued under Chapter 503, Transportation Code.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 972 (S.B. 228), Sec. 52, eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 933 (H.B. 3097), Sec. 3C.02, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 232.003. SUSPENSION OF LICENSE. (a) A court or the Title IV-D agency may issue an order suspending a license as provided by this chapter if an individual who is an obligor:

(1) owes overdue child support in an amount equal to or greater than the total support due for three months under a support order;

(2) has been provided an opportunity to make payments toward the overdue child support under a court-ordered or agreed repayment schedule; and

(3) has failed to comply with the repayment schedule.

(b) A court or the Title IV-D agency may issue an order suspending a license as provided by this chapter if a parent or alleged parent has failed, after receiving appropriate notice, to comply with a subpoena.

(c) A court may issue an order suspending license as provided by this chapter for an individual for whom a court has rendered an enforcement order under Chapter 157 finding that the individual has failed to comply with the terms of a court order providing for the possession of or access to a child.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 655, Sec. 5.03, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 751, Sec. 85, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 420, Sec. 22, 23, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 911, Sec. 83, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 556, Sec. 59, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 724, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1023, Sec. 59, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 232.004. PETITION FOR SUSPENSION OF LICENSE. (a) A child support agency or obligee may file a petition to suspend, as provided by this chapter, a license of an obligor who has an arrearage equal to or greater than the total support due for three months under a support order.

(b) In a Title IV-D case, the petition shall be filed with the Title IV-D agency, the court of continuing jurisdiction, or the tribunal in which a child support order has been registered under Chapter 159. The tribunal in which the petition is filed obtains jurisdiction over the matter.

(c) In a case other than a Title IV-D case, the petition shall be filed in the court of continuing jurisdiction or the court in which a child support order has been registered under Chapter 159.

(d) A proceeding in a case filed with the Title IV-D agency under this chapter is governed by the contested case provisions of Chapter 2001, Government Code, except that Section 2001.054 does not apply to the proceeding. The director of the Title IV-D agency or the director's designee may render a final decision in a contested case proceeding under this chapter.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 655, Sec. 5.03, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 751, Sec. 85, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 420, Sec. 24, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 911, Sec. 84, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 556, Sec. 60, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 972 (S.B. 228), Sec. 53, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 232.005. CONTENTS OF PETITION. (a) A petition under this chapter must state that license suspension is required under Section 232.003 and allege:

(1) the name and, if known, social security number of the individual;

(2) the name of the licensing authority that issued a license the individual is believed to hold; and

(3) the amount of arrearages owed under the child support order or the facts associated with the individual's failure to comply with:

(A) a subpoena; or

(B) the terms of a court order providing for the possession of or access to a child.

(b) A petition under this chapter may include as an attachment a copy of:

(1) the record of child support payments maintained by the Title IV-D registry or local registry;

(2) the subpoena with which the individual has failed to comply, together with proof of service of the subpoena; or

(3) with respect to a petition for suspension under Section 232.003(c):

(A) the enforcement order rendered under Chapter 157 describing the manner in which the individual was found to have not complied with the terms of a court order providing for the possession of or access to a child; and

(B) the court order containing the provisions that the individual was found to have violated.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 655, Sec. 5.03, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 751, Sec. 85, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 911, Sec. 85, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 724, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1023, Sec. 60, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 767 (S.B. 865), Sec. 29, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 232.006. NOTICE. (a) On the filing of a petition under Section 232.004, the clerk of the court or the Title IV-D agency shall deliver to the individual:

(1) notice of the individual's right to a hearing before the court or agency;

(2) notice of the deadline for requesting a hearing; and

(3) a hearing request form if the proceeding is in a Title IV-D case.

(b) Notice under this section may be served:

(1) if the party has been ordered under Chapter 105 to provide the court and registry with the party's current mailing address, by mailing a copy of the notice to the respondent, together with a copy of the petition, by first class mail to the last mailing address of the respondent on file with the court and the state case registry; or

(2) as in civil cases generally.

(c) The notice must contain the following prominently displayed statement in boldfaced type, capital letters, or underlined:

"AN ACTION TO SUSPEND ONE OR MORE LICENSES ISSUED TO YOU HAS BEEN FILED AS PROVIDED BY CHAPTER 232, TEXAS FAMILY CODE. YOU MAY EMPLOY AN ATTORNEY TO REPRESENT YOU IN THIS ACTION. IF YOU OR YOUR ATTORNEY DO NOT REQUEST A HEARING BEFORE THE 21ST DAY AFTER THE DATE OF SERVICE OF THIS NOTICE, AN ORDER SUSPENDING YOUR LICENSE MAY BE RENDERED."

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 655, Sec. 5.03, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 751, Sec. 85, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 911, Sec. 86, eff; Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 976, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 178, Sec. 11, eff. Aug. 30, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 972 (S.B. 228), Sec. 54, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 232.007. HEARING ON PETITION TO SUSPEND LICENSE. (a) A request for a hearing and motion to stay suspension must be filed with the court or Title IV-D agency by the individual not later than the 20th day after the date of service of the notice under Section 232.006.

(b) If a request for a hearing is filed, the court or Title IV-D agency shall:

(1) promptly schedule a hearing;

(2) notify each party of the date, time, and location of the hearing; and

(3) stay suspension pending the hearing.

(c) In a case involving support arrearages, a record of child support payments made by the Title IV-D agency or a local registry is evidence of whether the payments were made. A copy of the record appearing regular on its face shall be admitted as evidence at a hearing under this chapter, including a hearing on a motion to revoke a stay. Either party may offer controverting evidence.

(d) In a case in which an individual has failed to comply with a subpoena, proof of service is evidence of delivery of the subpoena.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 655, Sec. 5.03, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 751, Sec. 85, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 911, Sec. 87, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 232.008. ORDER SUSPENDING LICENSE FOR FAILURE TO PAY CHILD SUPPORT. (a) On making the findings required by Section 232.003, the court or Title IV-D agency shall render an order suspending the license unless the individual:

(1) proves that all arrearages and the current month's support have been paid;

(2) shows good cause for failure to comply with the subpoena or the terms of the court order providing for the possession of or access to a child; or

(3) establishes an affirmative defense as provided by Section 157.008(c).

(b) Subject to Subsection (b-1), the court or Title IV-D agency may stay an order suspending a license conditioned on the individual's compliance with:

(1) a reasonable repayment schedule that is incorporated in the order;

(2) the requirements of a reissued and delivered subpoena; or

(3) the requirements of any court order pertaining to the possession of or access to a child.

(b-1) The court or Title IV-D agency may not stay an order under Subsection (b)(1) unless the individual makes an immediate partial payment in an amount specified by the court or Title IV-D agency. The amount specified may not be less than $200.

(c) An order suspending a license with a stay of the suspension may not be served on the licensing authority unless the stay is revoked as provided by this chapter.

(d) A final order suspending license rendered by a court or the Title IV-D agency shall be forwarded to the appropriate licensing authority by the clerk of the court or Title IV-D agency. The clerk shall collect from an obligor a fee of $5 for each order mailed.

(e) If the court or Title IV-D agency renders an order suspending license, the individual may also be ordered not to engage in the licensed activity.

(f) If the court or Title IV-D agency finds that the petition for suspension should be denied, the petition shall be dismissed without prejudice, and an order suspending license may not be rendered.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 655, Sec. 5.03, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 751, Sec. 85, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 911, Sec. 88, eff; Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 976, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 556, Sec. 61, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 724, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 674 (H.B. 1846), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 232.009. DEFAULT ORDER. The court or Title IV-D agency shall consider the allegations of the petition for suspension to be admitted and shall render an order suspending the license of an obligor without the requirement of a hearing if the court or Title IV-D agency determines that the individual failed to respond to a notice issued under Section 232.006 by:

(1) requesting a hearing; or

(2) appearing at a scheduled hearing.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 655, Sec. 5.03, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 751, Sec. 85, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 420, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 911, Sec. 89, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1023, Sec. 61, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 232.010. REVIEW OF FINAL ADMINISTRATIVE ORDER. An order issued by a Title IV-D agency under this chapter is a final agency decision and is subject to review under the substantial evidence rule as provided by Chapter 2001, Government Code.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 655, Sec. 5.03, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 751, Sec. 85, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 232.011. ACTION BY LICENSING AUTHORITY. (a) On receipt of a final order suspending license, the licensing authority shall immediately determine if the authority has issued a license to the individual named on the order and, if a license has been issued:

(1) record the suspension of the license in the licensing authority's records;

(2) report the suspension as appropriate; and

(3) demand surrender of the suspended license if required by law for other cases in which a license is suspended.

(b) A licensing authority shall implement the terms of a final order suspending license without additional review or hearing. The authority may provide notice as appropriate to the license holder or to others concerned with the license.

(c) A licensing authority may not modify, remand, reverse, vacate, or stay an order suspending license issued under this chapter and may not review, vacate, or reconsider the terms of a final order suspending license.

(d) An individual who is the subject of a final order suspending license is not entitled to a refund for any fee or deposit paid to the licensing authority.

(e) An individual who continues to engage in the business, occupation, profession, or other licensed activity after the implementation of the order suspending license by the licensing authority is liable for the same civil and criminal penalties provided for engaging in the licensed activity without a license or while a license is suspended that apply to any other license holder of that licensing authority.

(f) A licensing authority is exempt from liability to a license holder for any act authorized under this chapter performed by the authority.

(g) Except as provided by this chapter, an order suspending license or dismissing a petition for the suspension of a license does not affect the power of a licensing authority to grant, deny, suspend, revoke, terminate, or renew a license.

(h) The denial or suspension of a driver's license under this chapter is governed by this chapter and not by the general licensing provisions of Chapter 521, Transportation Code.

(i) An order issued under this chapter to suspend a license applies to each license issued by the licensing authority subject to the order for which the obligor is eligible. The licensing authority may not issue or renew any other license for the obligor until the court or the Title IV-D agency renders an order vacating or staying an order suspending license.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 655, Sec. 5.03, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 751, Sec. 85, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 30.184, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 911, Sec. 90, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1023, Sec. 62, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 232.012. MOTION TO REVOKE STAY. (a) The obligee, support enforcement agency, court, or Title IV-D agency may file a motion to revoke the stay of an order suspending license if the individual who is subject of an order suspending license does not comply with:

(1) the terms of a reasonable repayment plan entered into by the individual;

(2) the requirements of a reissued subpoena; or

(3) the terms of any court order pertaining to the possession of or access to a child.

(b) Notice to the individual of a motion to revoke stay under this section may be given by personal service or by mail to the address provided by the individual, if any, in the order suspending license. The notice must include a notice of hearing. The notice must be provided to the individual not less than 10 days before the date of the hearing.

(c) A motion to revoke stay must allege the manner in which the individual failed to comply with the repayment plan, the reissued subpoena, or the court order pertaining to possession of or access to a child.

(d) If the court or Title IV-D agency finds that the individual is not in compliance with the terms of the repayment plan, reissued subpoena, or court order pertaining to possession of or access to a child, the court or agency shall revoke the stay of the order suspending license and render a final order suspending license.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 655, Sec. 5.03, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 751, Sec. 85, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 911, Sec. 91, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 724, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 232.013. VACATING OR STAYING ORDER SUSPENDING LICENSE. (a) The court or Title IV-D agency may render an order vacating or staying an order suspending an individual's license if:

(1) the individual has:

(A) paid all delinquent child support or has established a satisfactory payment record;

(B) complied with the requirements of a reissued subpoena; or

(C) complied with the terms of any court order providing for the possession of or access to a child; or

(2) the court or Title IV-D agency determines that good cause exists for vacating or staying the order.

(b) The clerk of the court or Title IV-D agency shall promptly deliver an order vacating or staying an order suspending license to the appropriate licensing authority. The clerk shall collect from an obligor a fee of $5 for each order mailed.

(c) On receipt of an order vacating or staying an order suspending license, the licensing authority shall promptly issue the affected license to the individual if the individual is otherwise qualified for the license.

(d) An order rendered under this section does not affect the right of the child support agency or obligee to any other remedy provided by law, including the right to seek relief under this chapter. An order rendered under this section does not affect the power of a licensing authority to grant, deny, suspend, revoke, terminate, or renew a license as otherwise provided by law.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 655, Sec. 5.03, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 751, Sec. 85, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 911, Sec. 92, eff; Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 976, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 724, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 610, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 232.0135. DENIAL OF LICENSE ISSUANCE OR RENEWAL. (a) A child support agency, as defined by Section 101.004, may provide notice to a licensing authority concerning an obligor who has failed to pay child support under a support order for six months or more that requests the authority to refuse to approve an application for issuance of a license to the obligor or renewal of an existing license of the obligor.

(b) A licensing authority that receives the information described by Subsection (a) shall refuse to approve an application for issuance of a license to the obligor or renewal of an existing license of the obligor until the authority is notified by the child support agency that the obligor has:

(1) paid all child support arrearages;

(2) made an immediate payment of not less than $200 toward child support arrearages owed and established with the agency a satisfactory repayment schedule for the remainder or is in compliance with a court order for payment of the arrearages;

(3) been granted an exemption from this subsection as part of a court-supervised plan to improve the obligor's earnings and child support payments; or

(4) successfully contested the denial of issuance or renewal of license under Subsection (d).

(c) On providing a licensing authority with the notice described by Subsection (a), the child support agency shall send a copy to the obligor by first class mail and inform the obligor of the steps the obligor must take to permit the authority to approve the obligor's application for license issuance or renewal.

(d) An obligor receiving notice under Subsection (c) may request a review by the child support agency to resolve any issue in dispute regarding the identity of the obligor or the existence or amount of child support arrearages. The agency shall promptly provide an opportunity for a review, either by telephone or in person, as appropriate to the circumstances. After the review, if appropriate, the agency may notify the licensing authority that it may approve the obligor's application for issuance or renewal of license. If the agency and the obligor fail to resolve any issue in dispute, the obligor, not later than the 30th day after the date of receiving notice of the agency's determination from the review, may file a motion with the court to direct the agency to withdraw the notice under Subsection (a) and request a hearing on the motion. The obligor's application for license issuance or renewal may not be approved by the licensing authority until the court rules on the motion. If, after a review by the agency or a hearing by the court, the agency withdraws the notice under Subsection (a), the agency shall reimburse the obligor the amount of any fee charged the obligor under Section 232.014.

(e) If an obligor enters into a repayment agreement with the child support agency under this section, the agency may incorporate the agreement in an order to be filed with and confirmed by the court in the manner provided for agreed orders under Chapter 233.

(f) In this section, "licensing authority" does not include the State Securities Board.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 972 (S.B. 228), Sec. 55, eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 508 (H.B. 1674), Sec. 15, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 508 (H.B. 1674), Sec. 16, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 674 (H.B. 1846), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 742 (S.B. 355), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 859 (S.B. 1726), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 232.014. FEE BY LICENSING AUTHORITY. (a) A licensing authority may charge a fee to an individual who is the subject of an order suspending license or of an action of a child support agency under Section 232.0135 to deny issuance or renewal of license in an amount sufficient to recover the administrative costs incurred by the authority under this chapter.

(b) A fee collected by the Texas Department of Motor Vehicles shall be deposited to the credit of the Texas Department of Motor Vehicles fund. A fee collected by the Department of Public Safety shall be deposited to the credit of the state highway fund.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 655, Sec. 5.03, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 751, Sec. 85, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 911, Sec. 93, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 972 (S.B. 228), Sec. 56, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 933 (H.B. 3097), Sec. 3C.03, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 508 (H.B. 1674), Sec. 17, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1287 (H.B. 2202), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 232.015. COOPERATION BETWEEN LICENSING AUTHORITIES AND TITLE IV-D AGENCY. (a) The Title IV-D agency may request from each licensing authority the name, address, social security number, license renewal date, and other identifying information for each individual who holds, applies for, or renews a license issued by the authority.

(b) A licensing authority shall provide the requested information in the form and manner identified by the Title IV-D agency.

(c) The Title IV-D agency may enter into a cooperative agreement with a licensing authority to administer this chapter in a cost-effective manner.

(d) The Title IV-D agency may adopt a reasonable implementation schedule for the requirements of this section.

(e) The Title IV-D agency, the comptroller, and the Texas Alcoholic Beverage Commission shall by rule specify additional prerequisites for the suspension of licenses relating to state taxes collected under Title 2, Tax Code. The joint rules must be adopted not later than March 1, 1996.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 751, Sec. 85, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1023, Sec. 63, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 232.016. RULES, FORMS, AND PROCEDURES. The Title IV-D agency by rule shall prescribe forms and procedures for the implementation of this chapter.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 655, Sec. 5.03, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 751, Sec. 85, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.